Utah statutes.
63C-8-103.   Medical Education Council.

(1)  There is created the Medical Education Council consisting of the following members appointed by the governor:

(a)  the dean of the school of medicine at the University of Utah;

(b)  a person who represents graduate medical education at the University of Utah;

(c)  a person from each institution, other than the University of Utah, that sponsors an accredited clinical education program;

(d)  a person from the health care insurance industry; and

(e)  three members of the general public who are not employed by or affiliated with any institution that offers, sponsors, or finances health care or medical education; however, the governor may appoint an additional member of the public under this Subsection (1)(e) for each person the governor appoints that increases the total number of persons appointed under Subsection (1)(c) beyond two.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(a) and (b), no two council members may be employed by or affiliated with the same:

(a)  institution of higher education;

(b)  state agency outside of higher education; or

(c)  private entity.

(3)  The dean of the school of medicine at the University of Utah:

(a)  shall chair the council;

(b)  may not be counted in determining the existence of a quorum; and

(c)  may only cast a vote on a matter before the council if the vote of the other council members results in a tied vote.

(4)  The council shall annually elect a vice chair from among the members of the council.

(5) (a)  Consistent with Subsection (6)(b), a majority of the council members constitute a quorum.

(b)  The action of a majority of a quorum is the action of the council.

(6) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (6)(b), members are appointed to four-year terms of office.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (6)(a), the governor shall, at the time of the initial appointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of council members are staggered so that approximately half of the council is appointed every two years.

(c)  If a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed by the governor for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment was made.

(7)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

